Illinois, session 104th, HB5189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Public Health Powers and 5Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is 6amended by adding Section 2310-750 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2310/2310-750 new)8    Sec. 2310-750. Mobile pregnancy application.9    (a) The Department shall partner with a mobile application 10vendor to promote awareness of Illinois' maternal and infant 11health programs for prenatal, pregnant, and postpartum 12individuals who are on Medicaid, who are eligible for 13Medicaid, or who are uninsured, including, but not limited to, 14home visiting services, doula services, behavioral health 15support, substance use support, Special Supplemental Nutrition 16Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) benefits, and 17any other Illinois program important to prenatal and 18postpartum health.19    (b) The Department may contract for a mobile pregnancy 20application on a statewide basis following a competitive 21bidding process pursuant to the Illinois Procurement Code.22    (c) The Department shall include the following application 23deliverables in its request for proposal:  HB5189- 2 -LRB104 19918 BDA 33368 b1        (1) the mobile pregnancy application shall have the 2    capability to deliver education, resources, and support to 3    prenatal, pregnant, and postpartum individuals and their 4    families, including information specific to Illinois, such 5    as links to Department and other State agency programs and 6    resources available to prenatal, pregnant, and postpartum 7    individuals;8        (2) the mobile pregnancy application shall demonstrate 9    a consistent workflow to increase awareness of State 10    agency programs and resources available to users of the 11    mobile pregnancy application;12        (3) the mobile pregnancy application must demonstrate 13    the ability to connect application users directly to 14    Illinois' existing websites where eligible individuals can 15    sign up for Illinois maternal health programs;16        (4) the mobile pregnancy application shall be able to 17    survey the mobile pregnancy application user's specific 18    questions as determined by the Department or other State 19    agencies;20        (5) the mobile pregnancy application shall include 21    information and resources that meet acceptable clinical 22    standards, including standards defined by:23            (A) the Centers for Disease Control and 24        Prevention;25            (B) the National Institutes of Health;26            (C) the American College of Obstetricians and   HB5189- 3 -LRB104 19918 BDA 33368 b1        Gynecologists;2            (D) the American Medical Association; and3            (E) the American Academy of Pediatrics;4        (6) the mobile pregnancy application shall provide 5    information in multiple languages; and6        (7) the mobile pregnancy application shall be made 7    available on both Android and iOS platforms.8    (d) The mobile pregnancy application shall regularly 9provide the Department with aggregate, deidentified data 10concerning:11        (1) the number of users of the mobile pregnancy 12    application that are on Medicaid, uninsured or eligible 13    for Medicaid;14        (2) the number of users of the mobile pregnancy 15    application that are engaging with Illinois-specific 16    content;17        (3) the number of users of the mobile pregnancy 18    application seeking additional information about 19    enrollment in the Medicaid program or other available 20    resources;21        (4) the number of monthly users of the mobile 22    pregnancy application;23        (5) the number of daily users of the mobile pregnancy 24    application;25        (6) the average length of time a user uses the mobile 26    pregnancy application; and  HB5189- 4 -LRB104 19918 BDA 33368 b1        (7) any other information requested by the Department 2    or other State agencies.3    (e) For individuals who do not have a smart phone, the 4mobile application vendor shall work to ensure that nondigital 5resources, such as flyers, are also made available that can 6provide awareness of State maternal and infant health 7programs.8    (f) Payment by the Department to the mobile application 9vendor shall be based on a $10 per user per month fee for each 10active user of the Illinois-tailored mobile pregnancy 11application who is on Medicaid, eligible for Medicaid, or 12uninsured, except that, notwithstanding the number of users, 13total payment to the mobile application vendor may not exceed 14$500,000 annually. The number of Illinois users of the mobile 15pregnancy application may not be capped by the mobile 16pregnancy application. Active users are those who download the 17app and use it at least once a month.18    (g) The Department of Public Health shall issue a request 19for proposals pursuant to this Section within 180 days of the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly.